Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5784.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the state uses demographic data to measure the efficacy of state-supported programs and determine equity of opportunity and access to many state programs. The legislature further finds that chapter 310, Laws of 2021 instructed the joint legislative audit and review committee to perform racial equity analyses as part of its audits of state agencies and programs, yet the committee is unable to fulfill this mandate because most state agencies do not collect the necessary data to fulfill this mission.The legislature further finds that the federal government office of management and budget published statistical policy directive number 15: Standards for maintaining, collecting, and presenting federal data on race and ethnicity, the goal of which is to ensure the comparability of race and ethnicity across federal data sets and to maximize the quality of the data by ensuring the format, language, and procedures for collecting the data are consistent. While statistical policy directive number 15 provides a minimum set of categories that all federal agencies must use when collecting information on race and ethnicity, that minimum is insufficient for the state of Washington because of its great diversity of ethnicities, cultures, backgrounds, and experiences.The legislature intends for all state agencies to collect demographic data, beyond those minimum categories listed in statistical policy directive number 15, in sufficient categories and subcategories appropriate for the programs being analyzed. For example, the Asian demographic must be broken down into as many subcategories of ethnicities as is necessary to measure the efficacy of our state-supported programs and determine the efficacy and equity of opportunity and access to those being evaluated. At a minimum, the Asian category must be disaggregated by subcategories including Chinese, Vietnamese, Filipino, Korean, Japanese, and Indian. Further disaggregation of the subcategories may be necessary depending on the circumstances such as disaggregating: Southeast Asians by Cambodian-Khmer, Thai, Lao, Mien, or Hmong; Pacific Islanders by compacts of free association states, Samoan, or Chamorro; or by language such as Cantonese, Mandarin, or Taishan. It is important for agencies and program administrators to understand that the Asian demographic is not one monolithic common demographic with the same needs or cultures. Therefore, the legislature finds that analyses of state agencies and programs must be based on the appropriate data set collected with regard to the appropriate target demographic categories and subcategories state programs are impacting.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Agency" means any state board, commission, bureau, committee, department, institution, division, or tribunal in the legislative, executive, or judicial branch of state government. "Agency" includes all elective offices, the state legislature, those institutions of higher education created and supported by the state government, and those courts that are parts of state government. "Agency" does not include a comprehensive cancer center participating in a collaborative arrangement as defined in RCW 28B.10.930 that is operated in conformance with RCW 28B.10.930.(2)(a) "Personal information" means:(i) An individual's first name or first initial and last name in combination with any one or more of the following data elements:(A) Social security number or the last four digits of the social security number;(B) Driver's license number or Washington identification card number;(C) Account number or credit or debit card number, in combination with any required security code, access code, or password that would permit access to an individual's financial account, or any other numbers or information that can be used to access a person's financial account;(D) Full date of birth;(E) Private key that is unique to an individual and that is used to authenticate or sign an electronic record;(F) Student, military, or passport identification number;(G) Health insurance policy number or health insurance identification number;(H) Any information about a consumer's medical history or mental or physical condition or about a health care professional's medical diagnosis or treatment of the consumer; or(I) Biometric data generated by automatic measurements of an individual's biological characteristics such as a fingerprint, voiceprint, retinas, irises, or other unique biological patterns or characteristics used to identify a specific individual;(ii) An individual's user name or email address in combination with a password or security questions and answers that would permit access to an online account; and(iii) Any of the data elements or any combination of the data elements described in (a)(i) of this subsection without the consumer's first name or first initial and last name if:(A) Encryption, redaction, or other methods have not rendered the data element or combination of data elements unusable; and(B) The data element or combination of data elements would enable a person to commit identity theft against a consumer.(b) The term "personal information" does not include publicly available information that is lawfully made available to the general public from federal, state, or local government records.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. (1) Each agency shall collect voluntary self-identification demographic data using the United States office of management and budget statistical policy directive number 15 as published on March 29, 2024, that provides common language for uniformity and comparability in the collection and use of race and ethnicity data, minimum categories, and corresponding detailed categories and subcategories used by the United States census bureau for Washington state population estimates, or other more granular demographic data as the agency may deem appropriate and necessary for its intended purpose.(2) Each agency must consider and base demographic data collection on the appropriate demographic data set necessary with regard to appropriate target demographic categories or subcategories of a program or agency being evaluated.(3) The data collected under subsection (1) of this section must be included in every demographic report on race or ethnic origin by the state agency, board, or commission published or released after June 30, 2030. The reports must state the reasoning and process used to determine the appropriate data set. If the appropriate data set cannot be collected, the report should state the reasons why. The data must be made available to the public in accordance with state and federal law including, but not limited to, the health insurance portability and accountability act and family educational rights and privacy act, and privacy protection standards including, but not limited to, data aggregation and suppression necessary to protect individual identities, and excluding personal information, which shall be deemed confidential.(4) If any questions arise regarding the appropriate racial, ethnic, or cultural categories or subcategories from which data should be collected for any given program, the state ethnic commissions and the governor's office of Indian affairs should be consulted for advice.(5) An agency must comply with the requirements of this section as early as possible following the effective date of this section, but at the latest by June 30, 2030.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. (1) The office of financial management shall convene and manage a multiagency committee that includes representatives from the state ethnic commissions, the governor's office of Indian affairs, office of equity, and office of privacy and data protection to review and approve requests for exemptions to the requirement to collect more detailed data beyond the minimum categories in statistical policy directive number 15. An agency may submit a request to the multiagency committee for an exemption to the requirement to collect more detailed data beyond the minimum categories if the agency determines that the potential benefit of the detailed data would not justify the additional burden to the agency and the public or the additional risk to privacy or confidentiality.(2) An agency may submit a request to the multiagency committee for a variance to the detailed categories used by the United States census bureau for Washington state if the agency determines that collecting different detailed data categories provides more useful or accurate data for the collection's specific context and intended uses. Any variances in detailed data collection must be able to be aggregated up to the required minimum categories.(3) The multiagency committee must review agency requests for exemptions and variances, and only approve the requests if:(a) The potential benefit of the detailed data would not justify the additional burden to the agency and the public or the additional risk to individual privacy or confidentiality; (b) The agency demonstrates that the exemption or variance is appropriate for target demographic categories or subcategories of a program or agency;(c) The agency is not the primary data collector;(d) The agency is required to report demographic data to federal agencies using different categories; or(e) They otherwise contain sufficient justification.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. (1) Each agency shall develop a multiyear phased plan for implementing the demographic data collection and reporting requirements in section 3 of this act. Agency plans must address:(a) Technology updates needed for technical implementation;(b) Statutory and rule changes needed;(c) Data security and guidelines for reporting that protect individual privacy;(d) Data governance;(e) Change management strategies including training and process modifications; and(f) The staffing, technology, and other costs associated with each of the above plan components.(2) Each agency must submit implementation plans to the multiagency committee by December 1, 2026, and the multiagency committee must submit a report summarizing statewide implementation needs and costs to the governor and legislature by June 30, 2027.Sec. 6. RCW 28A.300.042 and 2023 c 265 s 6 and 2023 c 242 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) The superintendent of public instruction must collect and school districts must submit all student-level data using the United States ((department of education 2007 race and ethnicity reporting guidelines, including the subracial and subethnic categories within those guidelines, with the following modifications:(a) Further disaggregation of the Black category to differentiate students of African origin and students native to the United States with African ancestors;(b) Further disaggregation of countries of origin for Asian students;(c) Further disaggregation of the White category to include subethnic categories for Eastern European nationalities that have significant populations in Washington; and(d) For students who report as multiracial, collection of their racial and ethnic combination of))office of management and budget statistical policy directive number 15 as published on March 29, 2024, that provides common language for uniformity and comparability in the collection and use of race and ethnicity data, minimum categories, and corresponding detailed categories.(2) Beginning with the ((2017-18))2025-26 school year, or as soon as practicable, school districts shall collect student-level data as provided in subsection (1) of this section for all newly enrolled students, including transfer students. When the students enroll in a different school within the district, school districts shall resurvey the newly enrolled students for whom subracial and subethnic categories were not previously collected. School districts may resurvey other students.(3) All student data-related reports required of the superintendent of public instruction in this title must be disaggregated by at least the following subgroups of students: White, Black, Hispanic, American Indian/Alaskan Native, Asian, Pacific Islander/Hawaiian Native, Middle Eastern/North African, low income, highly capable, transitional bilingual, migrant, special education, and students covered by section 504 of the federal rehabilitation act of 1973, as amended (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794).(4) All student data-related reports prepared by the superintendent of public instruction regarding student suspensions and expulsions as required under this title are subject to disaggregation by subgroups including:(a) Gender;(b) Foster care;(c) Homeless, if known;(d) School district;(e) School;(f) Grade level;(g) Behavior infraction code, including:(i) Bullying;(ii) Tobacco;(iii) Alcohol;(iv) Illicit drug;(v) Fighting without major injury;(vi) Violence without major injury;(vii) Violence with major injury;(viii) Possession of a weapon; and(ix) Other behavior resulting from a short-term or long-term suspension, expulsion, or interim alternative education setting intervention;(h) Intervention applied, including:(i) Short-term suspension;(ii) Long-term suspension;(iii) Emergency removal;(iv) Expulsion;(v) Interim alternative education settings;(vi) No intervention applied; and(vii) Other intervention applied that is not described in this subsection (4)(h);(i) Number of days a student is suspended or expelled, to be counted in half or full days; and(j) Any other categories added at a future date by the data governance group.(5) All student data-related reports required of the superintendent of public instruction regarding student suspensions and expulsions as required in RCW 28A.300.046 are subject to cross-tabulation at a minimum by the following:(a) School and district;(b) Race, low income, highly capable, special education, transitional bilingual, migrant, foster care, homeless, students covered by section 504 of the federal rehabilitation act of 1973, as amended (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794), and categories to be added in the future;(c) Behavior infraction code; and(d) Intervention applied.(6) The K-12 data governance group shall develop the data protocols and guidance for school districts in the collection of data as required under this section, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall modify the statewide student data system as needed. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall also incorporate training for school staff on best practices for collection of data under this section in other training or professional development related to data provided by the office.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 42 RCW.--- END ---